Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 4
SOUTHEASTERN INTERSTATE FOREST FIRE PROTECTION COMPACT

12-10-60. Required procedure to make compact effective; exchange of documents.

When the Governor shall have executed the compact on behalf of this state and shall have caused a verified copy thereof to be filed with the Secretary of State, and when the compact shall have been ratified by one or more of the states named in Code Section 12-10-61, then the compact shall become operative and effective as between this state and such other state or states. The Governor is authorized and directed to take such action as may be necessary to complete the exchange of official documents as between this state and any other state ratifying the compact.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 49, § 2.)

12-10-61. Authority of Governor to execute compact with designated states; legislative approval of compact; text of compact.

The Governor on behalf of this state is authorized to execute a compact, in substantially the following form, with any one or more of the states of Alabama, Florida, Kentucky, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, and West Virginia, and the General Assembly signifies in advance its approval and ratification of such compact:
'

'ARTICLE I.

The purpose of this compact is to promote effective prevention and control of forest fires in the Southeastern region of the United States by the development of integrated forest fire plans, by the maintenance of adequate forest fire fighting services by the member States, by providing for mutual aid in fighting forest fires among the compacting States of the region and with States which are party to other regional forest fire protection compacts or agreements, and for more adequate forest protection.

12-10-62. Process.

In pursuance of Article III of the compact, the director of the State Forestry Commission shall act as compact administrator for the State of Georgia of the Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact during his term of office as director, and his successor as compact administrator shall be his successor as director. As compact administrator the director shall be an ex officio member of the advisory committee of the Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact, and chairman ex officio of the Georgia members of said advisory committee.

There shall be four members of the Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact advisory committee from the State of Georgia. Two of the members from the State of Georgia shall be members of the General Assembly, one from the Senate and one from the House of Representatives, designated by the Georgia Commission on Interstate Cooperation; the terms of any such members shall terminate at the time they cease to hold legislative office; and their successors as members shall be named in like manner.

The Governor shall appoint the other two members of the advisory committee from the State of Georgia, one of whom shall be associated with forestry or forest products industries. The terms of such members shall be three years, and such members shall hold office until their respective successors shall be appointed and qualified. Vacancies occurring in the office of such members for any reason or cause shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term.

The director as compact administrator for the State of Georgia may delegate, from time to time, to any deputy or other subordinate in his department or office the power to be present and participate, including voting as his representative or substitute, at any meeting of or hearing by or other proceeding of the compact administrators or of the advisory committee.

The terms of each of the initial four memberships, whether appointed at such time or not, shall begin upon the date upon which the compact shall become effective in accordance with Article II of the compact.

Any member of the advisory committee may be removed from office by the Governor upon charges and after a hearing.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 49, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1533; Ga. L. 1981, p. 638, § 2.)

12-10-63. Authority to exercise powers under compact; cooperation with compact administrator.

There is granted to the director of the State Forestry Commission, as compact administrator and chairman ex officio of the Georgia members of the advisory committee, and to the members from Georgia of the advisory committee all the powers provided for in the compact and all the powers necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular.

All officers of the State of Georgia are authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective provinces and jurisdiction necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the compact in every particular; it being declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia to perform and carry out the compact and to accomplish the purposes thereof.

All officers, bureaus, departments, and persons of and in the government or administration of the State of Georgia are authorized and directed at convenient times, and upon request of the compact administrator or of the advisory committee, to furnish such information as they may possess regarding the purposes of the compact to the compact administrator or the advisory committee. They are further authorized to aid the compact administrator or the advisory committee by loan of personnel, equipment, or other means in carrying out the purposes of the compact.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 49, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1533; Ga. L. 1981, p. 638, § 2.)

12-10-64. Construction of article.

Any powers granted by this article to the State Forestry Commission shall be regarded as in aid of and supplemental to and in no case a limitation upon any of the powers vested in the commission by other laws of the State of Georgia or by the laws of the States of Alabama, Florida, Kentucky, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, and West Virginia or by the Congress of the United States or by the terms of the compact.

(Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 49, § 5.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, "States" was substituted for "states" preceding "of Alabama".